Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.480

Cooperation and agreements with other agencies.

The department may cooperate with and enter into agreements with other governmental agencies, whether of this state, other states, or agencies of the federal government, and with private associations, in order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1969 c 63 s 48.]